North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Filing Documents.

§ 55-1-20.
Filing requirements.

A document required or permitted by this Chapter to be filed by the Secretary of State must be filed under Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

A document submitted on behalf of a domestic or foreign corporation must be executed:

By the chair of its board of directors, by its president, or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

through (i). Reserved.

(j)

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-159, s. 15 effective October 11, 2002.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1967, c. 13, s. 1; c. 823, s. 16; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.1(a); 1991, c. 645, s. 15; 1999-369, s. 1.1; 2001-358, ss. 3(a), 6(a); 2001-387, ss. 1, 155, 173; 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-159, s. 15.

§ 55-1-21.
Forms.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for the following:

An application for a certificate of existence.

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State.

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal.

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-475, s. 6.2, effective January 1, 1998.

If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may promulgate and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this Chapter but their use is not mandatory.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-475, s. 6.2.

§ 55-1-22.
Filing, service, and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to the Secretary for filing:

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each time process is served on the Secretary under this Chapter. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying, comparing, and certifying a copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign corporation:

One dollar ($1.00) a page for copying or comparing a copy to the original.

Fifteen dollars ($15.00) for a paper certificate.

Ten dollars ($10.00) for an electronic certificate.

The fee for the annual report in subdivision (23) of this section is nonrefundable.

Document Fee (1) Articles of incorporation $125.00 (2) Application for reserved name 30.00 (3) Notice of transfer of reserved name 10.00 (4) Application for registered name 10.00 (5) Application for renewal of registered name 10.00 (6) Corporation’s statement of change of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (7) Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affected corporation 5.00 (8) Agent’s statement of resignation No fee (9) Designation of registered agent or registered office or both 5.00 (10) Amendment of articles of incorporation 50.00 (11) Restated articles of incorporation 10.00 with amendment of articles 50.00 (12) Articles of merger or share exchange 50.00 (12a) Articles of conversion (other than articles of conversion included as part of another document) 50.00 (13) Articles of dissolution 30.00 (14) Articles of revocation of dissolution 10.00 (15) Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee (16) Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution 100.00 (17) Certificate of reinstatement No fee (18) Certificate of judicial dissolution No fee (19) Application for certificate of authority 250.00 (20) Application for amended certificate of authority 75.00 (21) Application for certificate of withdrawal 25.00 (22) Certificate of revocation of authority to transact business No fee (23) Annual report (paper) 25.00 (23a) Annual report (electronic) 18.00 (24) Articles of correction 10.00 (25) Application for certificate of existence or authorization (paper) 15.00 (25a) Application for certificate of existence or authorization (electronic) 10.00 (26) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this Chapter 10.00 (27) Repealed by Session Laws , effective January 1, 2002. 2001-358, s. 6(b) (28) Articles of validation 150.00

History.

1957, c. 1180; 1967, c. 823, s. 20; 1969, c. 751, ss. 42, 43, 45; c. 797, ss. 4, 5; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 981, s. 1; 1983, c. 713, ss. 32-38; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; c. 714; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1057; 1991, c. 574, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 55.3; 1997-475, s. 5.1; 1997-485, s. 10; 2001-358, s. 6(b); 2001-387, ss. 2, 173; 2001-413, s. 6; 2002-126, ss. 29A.25, 29A.26; 2003-349, s. 7; 2007-323, s. 30.6(a); 2018-45, s. 1.

§§ 55-1-22.1 through 55-1-27.
[Transferred]

Transferred to §§ 55D-11 through 55D-17 by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 3(b).

§ 55-1-28.
Certificate of existence.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this State;

That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this State, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or (ii) that the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this State;

That the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation or the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation has not been suspended for failure to comply with the Revenue Act of this State and that the corporation has not been administratively dissolved for failure to comply with the provisions of this Chapter;

That its most recent annual report required by

G.S. 55-16-22

either has been delivered to the Secretary of State or is not delinquent;

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this State.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 1; 1997-475, s. 6.3.

§ 55-1-29.
[Transferred]

Transferred to § 55D-18 by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 3(b).